apertium-nob.proper-nob.dix
<!-- PARDEFS: Proper nouns -->
<!-- Transfer assumes that these never have number. -->
<pardef n="Eva__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Doris__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Jo__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Jens__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jr__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p><par n="'s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Aasen__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Kjos__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d'or__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d'autres__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="initial__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="init"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Blues__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Wikipedia__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Findus__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Lagtinget__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="nt"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Riksdagen__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="m"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Regjeringa__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Bundesliga/en__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="m"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="m"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Senterparti/et__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>et<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="nt"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r>et<s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Bondelag/et__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>et<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="nt"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r>et<s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Sosialdemokrat/ene__np" c="namn med fleirtalsform">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ene<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="m"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>ene<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="m"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r>ene<s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Opel_Rekord__n" c="multiword proper nouns and (trademarks, types, models, abbreviations) with inflection">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-er</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Marka__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Osen__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Midhavet__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Noreg__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ås__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Store__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="attr"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Store_no-cp__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="attr"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_no-cp"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\-_no-cp"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Les__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="attr"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="al">	<i>al</i><par n="Store_no-cp__np"/></e>
<e lm="af">	<i>af</i><par n="Store_no-cp__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dragos">	<i>Dragos</i><par n="Jens__np"/></e>
<e lm="Elyesa">	<i>Elyesa</i><par n="Jo__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lorenas">	<i>Lorenas</i><par n="Jens__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mohemed">	<i>Mohemed</i><par n="Jo__np"/></e>
<e lm="Asees">	<i>Asees</i><par n="Doris__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eloisa">	<i>Eloisa</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gertrudes">	<i>Gertrudes</i><par n="Doris__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mousumi">	<i>Mousumi</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tirhas">	<i>Tirhas</i><par n="Doris__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wehazit">	<i>Wehazit</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marmarahavet">	<i>Marmarahavet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Holmlia">	<i>Holmlia</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Adenbukta">	<i>Adenbukta</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jotunheimen">	<i>Jotunheimen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="Gennesaretsjøen"> <p><l>Genn</l><r>Gen</r></p><i>esaretsjøen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Klopas">	<i>Klopas</i><par n="Jens__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tor-Erik">	<i>Tor-Erik</i><par n="Jo__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jr">	<i>Jr</i><par n="jr__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mercurius">	<i>Mercurius</i><par n="Findus__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hedges">     <i>Hedges</i><par n="Kjos__np"/></e>
<e lm="Harling">     <i>Harling</i><par n="Aasen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Melendrez">     <i>Melendrez</i><par n="Kjos__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chmielinski">          <i>Chmielinski</i><par n="Aasen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Leinæs">          <i>Leinæs</i><par n="Kjos__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eleaskolen">	<i>Eleaskolen</i><par n="Riksdagen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bundesligaen">	<i>Bundesliga</i><par n="Bundesliga/en__np"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="Bundesligaen">	<p><l>bundesliga</l><r>Bundesliga</r></p><par n="Bundesliga/en__np"/></e>
<e lm="Senterpartiet">	<i>Senterparti</i><par n="Senterparti/et__np"/></e>
<e lm="Formigas">	<i>Formigas</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mållaget">	<i>Mållag</i><par n="Bondelag/et__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bondelaget">	<i>Bondelag</i><par n="Bondelag/et__np"/></e>
<e lm="Odenthal">	<i>Odenthal</i><par n="Noreg__np"/></e>
<e lm="Senèdes">	<i>Senèdes</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Centerpartiet">	<i>Centerparti</i><par n="Senterparti/et__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vaffel &amp; Vintage">	<i>Vaffel<b/>&amp;<b/>Vintage</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sounders">	<i>Sounders</i><par n="Findus__np"/></e>
<e lm="Blues">	<i>Blues</i><par n="Blues__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lucien"><i>Lucien</i><par n="Aasen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Les">  <i>Les</i><par n="d'autres__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hoplocephalus">	<i>Hoplocephalus</i><par n="Blues__np"/></e>
<e lm="Formosasundet">	<i>Formosasundet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hudson River">	<i>Hudson<b/>River</i><par n="Noreg__np"/></e>
<e lm="Næringsdepartementet">	<i>Næringsdepartementet</i><par n="Lagtinget__np"/></e>
<e lm="Valmyndigheten">	<i>Valmyndigheten</i><par n="Riksdagen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rovviltnemnda">	<i>Rovviltnemnda</i><par n="Regjeringa__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fridemokratene">	<i>Fridemokrat</i><par n="Sosialdemokrat/ene__np"/></e>
<e lm="Liberaldemokratene">	<i>Liberaldemokrat</i><par n="Sosialdemokrat/ene__np"/></e>
<e lm="døperen Johannes">       <i>døperen<b/>Johannes</i><par n="d'autres__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kulturrådet"><i>Kulturrådet</i><par n="Lagtinget__np"/></e>
<e lm="Europeisk">	<i>Europeisk</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Göteborgs">	<i>Göteborgs</i><par n="Les__np"/></e>
<e lm="Skaraborgs">	<i>Skaraborgs</i><par n="Les__np"/></e>
<e lm="Västre">	<i>Västre</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Utjamningsmeldinga">	<i>Utjamningsmeldinga</i><par n="Regjeringa__np"/></e>
<e lm="domstolloven">	<i>domstolloven</i><par n="d'or__np"/></e>
<e lm="statsborgarrettslova">	<i>statsborgarrettslova</i><par n="d'or__np"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="lov om infrastruktur for geografisk informasjon"><i>lov<b/>om<b/>infrastruktur<b/>for<b/>geografisk<b/>informasjon</i><par n="d'or__np"/></e>
<e lm="PrPc"> <i>PrPc</i><par n="Findus__np"/></e>
<e lm="Glencore Nikkelverk">	<i>Glencore<b/>Nikkelverk</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chris"><i>Chris</i><par n="d'autres__np"/></e>
